Louisiana, session 2026, SB216.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:111(B) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§111. Definition of death
* * *
B. The medical pronouncement of death by a coroner may also be based on
personal observation, information, or statements obtained from coroner investigators,
registered nurses, licensed practical nurses, physician assistants, or emergency
medical technicians at the scene who are reporting from firsthand observation of the
physical condition of the deceased. The time of death shall be reported as the time
that the death was reported or discovered. The name of the personnel that the coroner
is relying on shall be noted on the coroner's investigative report.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.